Idaho, session 2026, S1263.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 67-6539, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-6539. LIMITATIONS ON REGULATION OF SHORT-TERM RENTALS AND VACATION
RENTALS. (1) Neither a county nor a city may enact or enforce any ordinance
that has the express or practical effect of prohibiting short-term rentals
or vacation rentals in the county or city. A county or city may implement
such reasonable regulations as it deems necessary to safeguard the public
health, safety, and general welfare in order to protect the integrity of res-
idential neighborhoods in which short-term rentals or vacation rentals op-
erate. A short-term rental or vacation rental shall be classified as a res-
idential land use for zoning purposes subject to all applicable zoning re-
quirements applicable thereto.
(2) Neither a county nor a city can shall regulate the operation of a
short-term rental marketplace.
(3)(a) A county or city may require a license, permit, or certification
to operate a short-term rental only if:
(i) A property owner owns or has a financial interest in four (4)
or more short-term rentals within the jurisdiction, including
units held by commonly controlled entities, trusts, partnerships,
or affiliates; or
(ii) A short-term rental generates ten thousand dollars ($10,000)
or more in gross annual short-term rental revenue, defined as the
total amount paid by occupants for lodging before any deductions
for expenses, commissions, fees, taxes, or costs of operation dur-
ing a calendar year.
(b) A county or city may require owners of short-term rentals who do
not have a license, permit, or certification to register annually and
to designate a local contact person and may charge a reasonable adminis-
trative fee pursuant to section 63-1311, Idaho Code.
(4) A county or city may require a property owner or an owner's designee
to implement only the following regulations specifically applicable to
short-term rentals:
(a) Require that all living spaces in a short-term rental, including
bedrooms, living rooms, family rooms, and kitchens, be equipped with
functioning smoke alarms, whether interconnected smoke alarms, inde-
pendent battery-operated smoke alarms, or a combination of both such


alarms, and may require that the short-term rental be equipped with fire
extinguishers and removable escape ladders in sleeping areas above the
main floor;
(b) Require that each floor of a short-term rental be equipped with
functioning carbon monoxide detectors;
(c) Set maximum occupancy limits and zoning requirements for
short-term rentals based on non-transient residential land use con-
tained in the international fire code and building codes adopted by the
Idaho building code board; and
(d) Require a short-term rental owner or an owner's designee to provide
easily accessible informational handouts regarding the location of ex-
its, the location of fire extinguishers, the location of any first aid
kits, and the phone number and email address to contact the owner or man-
ager of the short-term rental in the case of an emergency.
(5) Any other reasonable regulations relating to safeguarding the
public health, safety, and general welfare shall not impose greater re-
strictions or obligations on short-term rentals than are imposed on similar
dwelling units, such as long-term rentals, or any other residential use that
is not a short-term rental.
(6) The provisions of this section shall not be construed to relieve an
owner of a short-term rental from any liability related to the ownership, op-
eration, or management of any short-term rental or to establish liability
for any county or city or agent thereof that enacts any ordinance governing
short-term rentals that it is authorized to enact by this section or that de-
clines to enact any ordinance governing short-term rentals that is not re-
quired pursuant to this section.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.